Luganda.aff
FLAG long
# Cross product of WN (Subordinating conjunction when with subjects in near and distant past tense) and Ob (Object markers) to FG
PFX FG Y 3380
PFX FG 0 wennaba .
PFX FG 0 wennagu .
PFX FG 0 wennagi .
PFX FG 0 wennazi .
PFX FG 0 wennaki .
PFX FG 0 wennabi .
PFX FG 0 wennali .
PFX FG 0 wennaga .
PFX FG 0 wennaka .
PFX FG 0 wennabu .
PFX FG 0 wennalu .
PFX FG 0 wennaku .
PFX FG 0 wennatu .
PFX FG 0 wennamu .
PFX FG 0 wewan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l wewand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l wewann l.[mn]
PFX FG w wewamp [w]
PFX FG 0 wewamu .
PFX FG 0 wewaba .
PFX FG 0 wewagu .
PFX FG 0 wewagi .
PFX FG 0 wewazi .
PFX FG 0 wewaki .
PFX FG 0 wewabi .
PFX FG 0 wewali .
PFX FG 0 wewaga .
PFX FG 0 wewaka .
PFX FG 0 wewabu .
PFX FG 0 wewalu .
PFX FG 0 wewaku .
PFX FG 0 wewatu .
PFX FG 0 weyan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l weyand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l weyann l.[mn]
PFX FG w weyamp [w]
PFX FG 0 weyamu .
PFX FG 0 weyaba .
PFX FG 0 weyagu .
PFX FG 0 weyagi .
PFX FG 0 weyazi .
PFX FG 0 weyaki .
PFX FG 0 weyabi .
PFX FG 0 weyali .
PFX FG 0 weyaga .
PFX FG 0 weyaka .
PFX FG 0 weyabu .
PFX FG 0 weyalu .
PFX FG 0 weyaku .
PFX FG 0 weyatu .
PFX FG 0 wetwan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l wetwand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l wetwann l.[mn]
PFX FG w wetwamp [w]
PFX FG 0 wetwamu .
PFX FG 0 wetwaba .
PFX FG 0 wetwagu .
PFX FG 0 wetwagi .
PFX FG 0 wetwazi .
PFX FG 0 wetwaki .
PFX FG 0 wetwabi .
PFX FG 0 wetwali .
PFX FG 0 wetwaga .
PFX FG 0 wetwaka .
PFX FG 0 wetwabu .
PFX FG 0 wetwalu .
PFX FG 0 wetwaku .
PFX FG 0 wetwatu .
PFX FG 0 wemwan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l wemwand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l wemwann l.[mn]
PFX FG w wemwamp [w]
PFX FG 0 wemwamu .
PFX FG 0 wemwaba .
PFX FG 0 wemwagu .
PFX FG 0 wemwagi .
PFX FG 0 wemwazi .
PFX FG 0 wemwaki .
PFX FG 0 wemwabi .
PFX FG 0 wemwali .
PFX FG 0 wemwaga .
PFX FG 0 wemwaka .
PFX FG 0 wemwabu .
PFX FG 0 wemwalu .
PFX FG 0 wemwaku .
PFX FG 0 wemwatu .
PFX FG 0 webaan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l webaand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l webaann l.[mn]
PFX FG w webaamp [w]
PFX FG 0 webaamu .
PFX FG 0 webaaba .
PFX FG 0 webaagu .
PFX FG 0 webaagi .
PFX FG 0 webaazi .
PFX FG 0 webaaki .
PFX FG 0 webaabi .
PFX FG 0 webaali .
PFX FG 0 webaaga .
PFX FG 0 webaaka .
PFX FG 0 webaabu .
PFX FG 0 webaalu .
PFX FG 0 webaaku .
PFX FG 0 webaatu .
PFX FG 0 wegwan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l wegwand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l wegwann l.[mn]
PFX FG w wegwamp [w]
PFX FG 0 wegwamu .
PFX FG 0 wegwaba .
PFX FG 0 wegwagu .
PFX FG 0 wegwagi .
PFX FG 0 wegwazi .
PFX FG 0 wegwaki .
PFX FG 0 wegwabi .
PFX FG 0 wegwali .
PFX FG 0 wegwaga .
PFX FG 0 wegwaka .
PFX FG 0 wegwabu .
PFX FG 0 wegwalu .
PFX FG 0 wegwaku .
PFX FG 0 wegwatu .
PFX FG 0 wegyan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l wegyand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l wegyann l.[mn]
PFX FG w wegyamp [w]
PFX FG 0 wegyamu .
PFX FG 0 wegyaba .
PFX FG 0 wegyagu .
PFX FG 0 wegyagi .
PFX FG 0 wegyazi .
PFX FG 0 wegyaki .
PFX FG 0 wegyabi .
PFX FG 0 wegyali .
PFX FG 0 wegyaga .
PFX FG 0 wegyaka .
PFX FG 0 wegyabu .
PFX FG 0 wegyalu .
PFX FG 0 wegyaku .
PFX FG 0 wegyatu .
PFX FG 0 wezaan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l wezaand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l wezaann l.[mn]
PFX FG w wezaamp [w]
PFX FG 0 wezaamu .
PFX FG 0 wezaaba .
PFX FG 0 wezaagu .
PFX FG 0 wezaagi .
PFX FG 0 wezaazi .
PFX FG 0 wezaaki .
PFX FG 0 wezaabi .
PFX FG 0 wezaali .
PFX FG 0 wezaaga .
PFX FG 0 wezaaka .
PFX FG 0 wezaabu .
PFX FG 0 wezaalu .
PFX FG 0 wezaaku .
PFX FG 0 wezaatu .
PFX FG 0 wekyaan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l wekyaand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l wekyaann l.[mn]
PFX FG w wekyaamp [w]
PFX FG 0 wekyaamu .
PFX FG 0 wekyaaba .
PFX FG 0 wekyaagu .
PFX FG 0 wekyaagi .
PFX FG 0 wekyaazi .
PFX FG 0 wekyaaki .
PFX FG 0 wekyaabi .
PFX FG 0 wekyaali .
PFX FG 0 wekyaaga .
PFX FG 0 wekyaaka .
PFX FG 0 wekyaabu .
PFX FG 0 wekyaalu .
PFX FG 0 wekyaaku .
PFX FG 0 wekyaatu .
PFX FG 0 webyaan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l webyaand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l webyaann l.[mn]
PFX FG w webyaamp [w]
PFX FG 0 webyaamu .
PFX FG 0 webyaaba .
PFX FG 0 webyaagu .
PFX FG 0 webyaagi .
PFX FG 0 webyaazi .
PFX FG 0 webyaaki .
PFX FG 0 webyaabi .
PFX FG 0 webyaali .
PFX FG 0 webyaaga .
PFX FG 0 webyaaka .
PFX FG 0 webyaabu .
PFX FG 0 webyaalu .
PFX FG 0 webyaaku .
PFX FG 0 webyaatu .
PFX FG 0 welyaan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l welyaand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l welyaann l.[mn]
PFX FG w welyaamp [w]
PFX FG 0 welyaamu .
PFX FG 0 welyaaba .
PFX FG 0 welyaagu .
PFX FG 0 welyaagi .
PFX FG 0 welyaazi .
PFX FG 0 welyaaki .
PFX FG 0 welyaabi .
PFX FG 0 welyaali .
PFX FG 0 welyaaga .
PFX FG 0 welyaaka .
PFX FG 0 welyaabu .
PFX FG 0 welyaalu .
PFX FG 0 welyaaku .
PFX FG 0 welyaatu .
PFX FG 0 wegaan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l wegaand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l wegaann l.[mn]
PFX FG w wegaamp [w]
PFX FG 0 wegaamu .
PFX FG 0 wegaaba .
PFX FG 0 wegaagu .
PFX FG 0 wegaagi .
PFX FG 0 wegaazi .
PFX FG 0 wegaaki .
PFX FG 0 wegaabi .
PFX FG 0 wegaali .
PFX FG 0 wegaaga .
PFX FG 0 wegaaka .
PFX FG 0 wegaabu .
PFX FG 0 wegaalu .
PFX FG 0 wegaaku .
PFX FG 0 wegaatu .
PFX FG 0 wekaan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l wekaand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l wekaann l.[mn]
PFX FG w wekaamp [w]
PFX FG 0 wekaamu .
PFX FG 0 wekaaba .
PFX FG 0 wekaagu .
PFX FG 0 wekaagi .
PFX FG 0 wekaazi .
PFX FG 0 wekaaki .
PFX FG 0 wekaabi .
PFX FG 0 wekaali .
PFX FG 0 wekaaga .
PFX FG 0 wekaaka .
PFX FG 0 wekaabu .
PFX FG 0 wekaalu .
PFX FG 0 wekaaku .
PFX FG 0 wekaatu .
PFX FG 0 webwan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l webwand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l webwann l.[mn]
PFX FG w webwamp [w]
PFX FG 0 webwamu .
PFX FG 0 webwaba .
PFX FG 0 webwagu .
PFX FG 0 webwagi .
PFX FG 0 webwazi .
PFX FG 0 webwaki .
PFX FG 0 webwabi .
PFX FG 0 webwali .
PFX FG 0 webwaga .
PFX FG 0 webwaka .
PFX FG 0 webwabu .
PFX FG 0 webwalu .
PFX FG 0 webwaku .
PFX FG 0 webwatu .
PFX FG 0 welwan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l welwand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l welwann l.[mn]
PFX FG w welwamp [w]
PFX FG 0 welwamu .
PFX FG 0 welwaba .
PFX FG 0 welwagu .
PFX FG 0 welwagi .
PFX FG 0 welwazi .
PFX FG 0 welwaki .
PFX FG 0 welwabi .
PFX FG 0 welwali .
PFX FG 0 welwaga .
PFX FG 0 welwaka .
PFX FG 0 welwabu .
PFX FG 0 welwalu .
PFX FG 0 welwaku .
PFX FG 0 welwatu .
PFX FG 0 wekwan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l wekwand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l wekwann l.[mn]
PFX FG w wekwamp [w]
PFX FG 0 wekwamu .
PFX FG 0 wekwaba .
PFX FG 0 wekwagu .
PFX FG 0 wekwagi .
PFX FG 0 wekwazi .
PFX FG 0 wekwaki .
PFX FG 0 wekwabi .
PFX FG 0 wekwali .
PFX FG 0 wekwaga .
PFX FG 0 wekwaka .
PFX FG 0 wekwabu .
PFX FG 0 wekwalu .
PFX FG 0 wekwaku .
PFX FG 0 wekwatu .
PFX FG 0 wegaan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l wegaand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l wegaann l.[mn]
PFX FG w wegaamp [w]
PFX FG 0 wegaamu .
PFX FG 0 wegaaba .
PFX FG 0 wegaagu .
PFX FG 0 wegaagi .
PFX FG 0 wegaazi .
PFX FG 0 wegaaki .
PFX FG 0 wegaabi .
PFX FG 0 wegaali .
PFX FG 0 wegaaga .
PFX FG 0 wegaaka .
PFX FG 0 wegaabu .
PFX FG 0 wegaalu .
PFX FG 0 wegaaku .
PFX FG 0 wegaatu .
PFX FG 0 wetwan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l wetwand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l wetwann l.[mn]
PFX FG w wetwamp [w]
PFX FG 0 wetwamu .
PFX FG 0 wetwaba .
PFX FG 0 wetwagu .
PFX FG 0 wetwagi .
PFX FG 0 wetwazi .
PFX FG 0 wetwaki .
PFX FG 0 wetwabi .
PFX FG 0 wetwali .
PFX FG 0 wetwaga .
PFX FG 0 wetwaka .
PFX FG 0 wetwabu .
PFX FG 0 wetwalu .
PFX FG 0 wetwaku .
PFX FG 0 wetwatu .
PFX FG 0 bwennaba .
PFX FG 0 bwennagu .
PFX FG 0 bwennagi .
PFX FG 0 bwennazi .
PFX FG 0 bwennaki .
PFX FG 0 bwennabi .
PFX FG 0 bwennali .
PFX FG 0 bwennaga .
PFX FG 0 bwennaka .
PFX FG 0 bwennabu .
PFX FG 0 bwennalu .
PFX FG 0 bwennaku .
PFX FG 0 bwennatu .
PFX FG 0 bwennamu .
PFX FG 0 bwewan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l bwewand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l bwewann l.[mn]
PFX FG w bwewamp [w]
PFX FG 0 bwewamu .
PFX FG 0 bwewaba .
PFX FG 0 bwewagu .
PFX FG 0 bwewagi .
PFX FG 0 bwewazi .
PFX FG 0 bwewaki .
PFX FG 0 bwewabi .
PFX FG 0 bwewali .
PFX FG 0 bwewaga .
PFX FG 0 bwewaka .
PFX FG 0 bwewabu .
PFX FG 0 bwewalu .
PFX FG 0 bwewaku .
PFX FG 0 bwewatu .
PFX FG 0 bweyan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l bweyand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l bweyann l.[mn]
PFX FG w bweyamp [w]
PFX FG 0 bweyamu .
PFX FG 0 bweyaba .
PFX FG 0 bweyagu .
PFX FG 0 bweyagi .
PFX FG 0 bweyazi .
PFX FG 0 bweyaki .
PFX FG 0 bweyabi .
PFX FG 0 bweyali .
PFX FG 0 bweyaga .
PFX FG 0 bweyaka .
PFX FG 0 bweyabu .
PFX FG 0 bweyalu .
PFX FG 0 bweyaku .
PFX FG 0 bweyatu .
PFX FG 0 bwetwan [^lmnb]
PFX FG l bwetwand l.[^mn]
PFX FG l bwetwann l.[mn]
